Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8276.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-9-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-9 entitled "Tax Sales" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
44-9-10. Notice of sale to taxpayer.
(a) Whether or not the person or general partnership to whom the estate is taxed as of
December 31st prior to the tax sale is a resident of this state, the collector shall, in addition to the
foregoing, notify the taxpayer of the time and place of sale first by first-class mail not less than
ninety (90) days before the date of sale or any adjournment of the sale, and again by certified mail
not less than forty (40) days before the date of sale or any adjournment of the sale, sent postpaid to
the street address of the real estate liable for payment of taxes, and, if different, to the taxpayer’s
address listed with the tax assessor’s office of the city or town where the real estate is located or to
any other address which the taxpayer designates by written notice to the tax assessor, or to the
address of the taxpayer stated on the deed recorded in the land evidence records of the city or town
where the real estate is located or to the last-known address of the taxpayer or be left at the
taxpayer’s last-known address or personally served on the taxpayer not less than thirty (30) days
before the date of sale or any adjournment of the sale, but no notice of adjournments shall be
necessary other than the announcement made at the sale. Copies of such notices shall be provided
to Rhode Island Housing and Mortgage Finance Corporation by mail or hand delivery, or a manifest
of such notices shall be electronically delivered in a machine-readable format through secure means
established by the Rhode Island Housing and Mortgage Finance Corporation not less than forty

(40) days before the date of sale or any adjournment of the sale. Failure to notify the Rhode Island
Housing and Mortgage Finance Corporation as prescribed herein shall nullify any tax sale of any
property with respect to which such notice was not given. Failure to notify the taxpayer as
prescribed herein shall nullify any tax sale of any property with respect to which such notice was
not given. The notice required to be provided to the taxpayer pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection shall include a current copy of § 44-9-10, with a headline in at least twelve (12) point
font at the top: “The city/town is required to provide proper notice to you, the taxpayer, before
conducting a tax sale, as described below:” and include current contact information including email
address, phone number, and physical mailing address for the Rhode Island mortgage finance
corporation.
(b) Persons aged sixty-five (65) years and over or persons suffering from a disability may
designate a third party to whom notice may be sent as required pursuant to this section by advising
the tax assessor of the name and address of the person.
(c) If the estate taxed is a corporation, the notice may be sent either by registered or certified
mail to its place of business or left at the business office of the corporation with some person
employed there.
(d) In the event the person to whom the estate is taxed is listed in the records of the assessor
and/or collector as having applied for and been granted a property tax abatement based wholly or
partially on the age of the taxpayer, then the collector shall also notify the office of healthy aging
by mail, hand delivery, or a manifest of such notices shall be electronically delivered in a machine-
readable format through the secure means established by the Rhode Island Housing and Mortgage
Finance Corporation pursuant to subsection (a), not less than forty (40) days before the date of sale.
Failure to notify the office of healthy aging as prescribed herein shall nullify any tax sale of any
property with respect to which such notice was not given.
(e) Within ninety (90) days after the end of each calendar year, the office of healthy aging
shall prepare and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of
representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state. The report shall contain
information concerning the number of notices received by the office of healthy aging pursuant to
this section of law during the calendar year and information concerning the identity of the specific
parcels that might be sold in each city or town as well as a description of exactly what action
followed on each such notice. The report shall conclude by indicating the present status of each
case in which the division received such a notice as well as an indication as to whether each such
case is open or closed.
LC006019 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006019
========
LC006019 - Page 3 of 4